Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.700

Physical education in curriculum.

The *state board for community college education, the boards of trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College, and the boards of regents of the state universities, with appreciation of the legislature's desire to emphasize physical education courses in their respective institutions, shall provide for the same, being cognizant of legislative guide lines put forth in RCW 28A.230.050 relating to physical education courses in high schools.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 31; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.700. Prior: 1963 c 235 s 1, part; prior: (i) 1923 c 78 s 1, part; 1919 c 89 s 2, part; RRS s 4683, part. (ii) 1919 c 89 s 5, part; RRS s 4686, part. Formerly RCW 28.05.040, part.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The state board for community college education was renamed the state board for community and technical colleges by 1991 c 238 s 30.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.